Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.272

Lightweight stud.

(1) "Lightweight stud" means a stud intended for installation and use in a vehicle tire. As used in this title, this means a stud that is recommended by the manufacturer of the tire for the type and size of the tire and that:

(a) Weighs no more than 1.5 grams if the stud conforms to Tire Stud Manufacturing Institute (TSMI) stud size 14 or less;

(b) Weighs no more than 2.3 grams if the stud conforms to TSMI stud size 15 or 16; or

(c) Weighs no more than 3.0 grams if the stud conforms to TSMI stud size 17 or larger.

(2) A lightweight stud may contain any materials necessary to achieve the lighter weight.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to retractable studs as described in RCW 46.37.420.

[ 2007 c 140 s 1; 1999 c 219 s 1.]